Hawaii statutes.
[§346-402] Court-appointed attorneys.
The court may appoint an attorney sua sponte or at the request of any
party to represent a young adult who is eligible under section 346-395 and has
signed the voluntary care agreement as described in section [346-396] if it is
deemed by the court to be in the young adult's best interest. Attorneys who
are appointed by the court to represent a qualifying young adult may be paid by
the court, unless the young adult for whom counsel is appointed has an
independent estate sufficient to pay fees and costs. [L 2013, c 252, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next